Utah statutes.
72-10-205.   Acquisition of property -- Condemnation.

(1)  Private property needed by the division or a county, municipality, or airport authority for an airport or landing field or for the expansion of an airport or landing field may be acquired by grant, purchase, lease, or other means if the division or the political subdivision is able to agree with the owners of the property on the terms of acquisition.

(2)  If no agreement can be reached, the private property may be obtained by condemnation in the manner provided for the state or a political subdivision to acquire real property for public purposes.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

